Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 4. Oil and Gas Competitiveness Review Board.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions relating to initial appointments to the Oil and Gas Competitiveness Review Board, see sec. 37, ch. 10, SLA 2013.

Sec. 43.98.040.
Oil and Gas Competitiveness Review Board.

History.

(§ 34 ch 10 SLA 2013)

Sec. 43.98.050.
Duties.

History.

(§ 34 ch 10 SLA 2013)

Sec. 43.98.060.
Information to be provided to board.

History.

(§ 34 ch 10 SLA 2013)

Sec. 43.98.070.
Definition.

History.

(§ 34 ch 10 SLA 2013)